src/fst/affixes/verbs.lexc
LEXICON SI !!≈ * **@CODE@**
          +V+Inf:si     # ;
          +V+Imp:si     # ;
      +V+Ind+Prs:sier   # ;
 +V+Ind+Prs+Pass:sies   # ;
      +V+Ind+Prt:sa     # ;
       +V+PrfPrc:sagt   # ;
       +V+PrsPrc:siende # ;
LEXICON SKJELVE !!≈ * **@CODE@**
          +V+Inf:skjelve    # ;
          +V+Imp:skjelv     # ;
      +V+Ind+Prs:skjelver   # ;
 +V+Ind+Prs+Pass:skjelves   # ;
      +V+Ind+Prt:skalv      # ;
       +V+PrfPrc:skjelvet   # ;
       +V+PrsPrc:skjelvende # ;
LEXICON SKJÆRE !!≈ * **@CODE@**
              +V+Inf:skjære    # ;
              +V+Imp:skjær     # ;
          +V+Ind+Prs:skjærer   # ;
     +V+Ind+Prs+Pass:skjæres   # ;
          +V+Ind+Prt:skar      # ;
 +V+Ind+Prt+Err/Orth:skjærte   # ;
           +V+PrfPrc:skåret    # ;
  +V+PrfPrc+Err/Orth:skjært    # ;
           +V+PrsPrc:skjærende # ;
LEXICON SKLI !!≈ * **@CODE@**
            +V+Inf:skli     # ;
            +V+Imp:skli     # ;
        +V+Ind+Prs:sklir    # ;
   +V+Ind+Prs+Pass:sklis    # ;
 +V+Ind+Prt+Use/NG:sklidde  # ;
 +V+Ind+Prt+Use/NG:skled    # ;
        +V+Ind+Prt:sklei    # ;
         +V+PrfPrc:sklidd   # ;
         +V+PrsPrc:skliende # ;
LEXICON SKRIDE !!≈ * **@CODE@**
          +V+Inf:skride    # ;
          +V+Imp:skrid     # ;
      +V+Ind+Prs:skrider   # ;
      +V+Ind+Prs:skrir     # ;
 +V+Ind+Prs+Pass:skrides   # ;
 +V+Ind+Prs+Pass:skris     # ;
      +V+Ind+Prt:skred     # ;
       +V+PrfPrc:skredet   # ;
       +V+PrsPrc:skridende # ;
LEXICON RIDE !!≈ * **@CODE@**
            +V+Inf:ride    # ;
            +V+Imp:rid     # ;
        +V+Ind+Prs:rider   # ;
   +V+Ind+Prs+Pass:rides   # ; 
 +V+Ind+Prt+Use/NG:red     # ;
        +V+Ind+Prt:rei     # ; 
         +V+PrfPrc:ridd    # ;
         +V+PrsPrc:ridende # ;
LEXICON LIDE !!≈ * **@CODE@**
           +V+Inf:lide    # ;
           +V+Imp:lid     # ;
       +V+Ind+Prs:lider   # ;
  +V+Ind+Prs+Pass:lides   # ; 
+V+Ind+Prt+Use/NG:led     # ; 
       +V+Ind+Prt:lei     # ; 
        +V+PrfPrc:lidd    # ;
 +V+PrfPrc+Use/NG:lidt    # ;
        +V+PrsPrc:lidende # ;
LEXICON KVEDE !!≈ * **@CODE@**
          +V+Inf:kvede    # ;
          +V+Imp:kved     # ;
      +V+Ind+Prs:kveder   # ; 
 +V+Ind+Prs+Pass:kvedes   # ; 
      +V+Ind+Prt:kvad     # ; 
       +V+PrfPrc:kvedet   # ;
       +V+PrsPrc:kvedende # ;
LEXICON SKRIKE !!≈ * **@CODE@**
            +V+Inf:skrike    # ;
            +V+Imp:skrik     # ;
        +V+Ind+Prs:skriker   # ;
   +V+Ind+Prs+Pass:skrikes   # ;
        +V+Ind+Prt:skreik    # ;
 +V+Ind+Prt+Use/NG:skrek     # ;
         +V+PrfPrc:skreket   # ;
         +V+PrsPrc:skrikende # ;
LEXICON SKRIVE !!≈ * **@CODE@**
            +V+Inf:skrive    # ;
            +V+Imp:skriv     # ;
        +V+Ind+Prs:skriver   # ;
 +V+Ind+Prt+Use/NG:skrev     # ;
        +V+Ind+Prt:skreiv    # ;
         +V+PrfPrc:skrevet   # ;
         +V+PrsPrc:skrivende # ;
   +V+Ind+Prs+Pass:skrives   # ;
LEXICON SKRYTE !!≈ * **@CODE@**
              +V+Inf:skryte    # ;
              +V+Imp:skryt     # ;
          +V+Ind+Prs:skryter   # ;
     +V+Ind+Prs+Pass:skrytes   # ;
          +V+Ind+Prt:skrytte   # ;
   +V+Ind+Prt+Use/NG:skrøt     # ;
 +V+Ind+Prt+Err/Orth:skraut    # ;
+V+Ind+Prt++Err/Orth:skrøyt    # ;
           +V+PrfPrc:skrytt    # ;
           +V+PrsPrc:skrytende # ;
LEXICON SKULLE !!≈ * **@CODE@**
     +V+Inf:skulle  # ;
 +V+Ind+Prs:skal    # ;
 +V+Ind+Prt:skulle  # ;
  +V+PrfPrc:skullet # ;
LEXICON SKVETTE !!≈ * **@CODE@**
          +V+Inf:skvette    # ;
          +V+Imp:skvett     # ;
      +V+Ind+Prs:skvetter   # ;
 +V+Ind+Prs+Pass:skvettes   # ;
      +V+Ind+Prt:skvatt     # ;
       +V+PrfPrc:skvettet   # ;
       +V+PrsPrc:skvettende # ;
LEXICON SKYTE !!≈ * **@CODE@**
              +V+Inf:skyte    # ;
              +V+Imp:skyt     # ;
          +V+Ind+Prs:skyter   # ;
     +V+Ind+Prs+Pass:skytes   # ;
          +V+Ind+Prt:skøyt    # ;     
   +V+Ind+Prt+Use/NG:skjøt    # ;
 +V+Ind+Prt+Err/Orth:skaut    # ;
           +V+PrfPrc:skutt    # ;
           +V+PrsPrc:skytende # ;
LEXICON SKYVE !!≈ * **@CODE@**
             +V+Inf:skyve    # ;
             +V+Imp:skyv     # ;
         +V+Ind+Prs:skyver   # ;
    +V+Ind+Prs+Pass:skyves   # ;
         +V+Ind+Prt:skøyv    # ;
  +V+Ind+Prt+Use/NG:skjøv    # ;
+V+Ind+Prt+Err/Orth:skauv    # ;
          +V+PrfPrc:skjøvet  # ;
          +V+PrsPrc:skyvende # ;
LEXICON SLEPPE !!≈ * **@CODE@**
          +V+Inf:sleppe    # ;
          +V+Imp:slepp     # ;
      +V+Ind+Prs:slepper   # ;
 +V+Ind+Prs+Pass:sleppes   # ;
      +V+Ind+Prt:slapp     # ;
       +V+PrfPrc:sluppet   # ;
       +V+PrsPrc:sleppende # ;
LEXICON SLÅSS !!≈ * **@CODE@**
        +V+Inf:slåss     # ;
        +V+Imp:slåss     # ;
    +V+Ind+Prs:slåss     # ;
    +V+Ind+Prt:sloss     # ;
 +V+Ind+PrfPrc:slåss     # ;
     +V+PrsPrc:slåssende # ;
LEXICON SLÅ !!≈ * **@CODE@**
          +V+Inf:slå     # ;
          +V+Imp:slå     # ;
      +V+Ind+Prs:slår    # ;
 +V+Ind+Prs+Pass:slås    # ;
      +V+Ind+Prt:slo     # ;
       +V+PrfPrc:slått   # ;
       +V+PrsPrc:slående # ;
LEXICON SMELLE !!≈ * **@CODE@**
          +V+Inf:smelle    # ;
          +V+Imp:smell     # ;
      +V+Ind+Prs:smeller   # ;
 +V+Ind+Prs+Pass:smelles   # ;
      +V+Ind+Prt:smalt     # ;
       +V+PrfPrc:smelt     # ;
       +V+PrsPrc:smellende # ;
LEXICON SMETTE !!≈ * **@CODE@**
          +V+Inf:smette    # ;
          +V+Imp:smett     # ;
      +V+Ind+Prs:smetter   # ;
 +V+Ind+Prs+Pass:smettes   # ;
      +V+Ind+Prt:smatt     # ;
       +V+PrfPrc:smettet   # ;
       +V+PrsPrc:smettende # ;
LEXICON SMYGE !!≈ * **@CODE@**
              +V+Inf:smyge    # ;
              +V+Imp:smyg     # ;
          +V+Ind+Prs:smyger   # ;
     +V+Ind+Prs+Pass:smyges   # ;
          +V+Ind+Prt:smøyg    # ;
   +V+Ind+Prt+Use/NG:smøg     # ;
 +V+Ind+Prt+Err/Orth:smaug    # ;
           +V+PrfPrc:smøget   # ;
           +V+PrsPrc:smygende # ;
LEXICON SMØRE !!≈ * **@CODE@**
          +V+Inf:smøre    # ;
          +V+Imp:smør     # ;
      +V+Ind+Prs:smører   # ;
 +V+Ind+Prs+Pass:smøres   # ;
      +V+Ind+Prt:smurte   # ;
       +V+PrfPrc:smurt    # ;
       +V+PrsPrc:smørende # ;
LEXICON SNIKE !!≈ * **@CODE@**
            +V+Inf:snike    # ;
            +V+Imp:snik     # ;
        +V+Ind+Prs:sniker   # ;
   +V+Ind+Prs+Pass:snikes   # ;
        +V+Ind+Prt:sneik    # ;
 +V+Ind+Prt+Use/NG:snek     # ;
         +V+PrfPrc:sneket   # ;
         +V+PrsPrc:snikende # ;
LEXICON SNYTE !!≈ * **@CODE@**
            +V+Inf:snyte    # ;
            +V+Imp:snyt     # ;
        +V+Ind+Prs:snyter   # ;
   +V+Ind+Prs+Pass:snytes   # ;
        +V+Ind+Prt:snøyt    # ;
 +V+Ind+Prt+Use/NG:snøt     # ;
         +V+PrfPrc:snytt    # ;
         +V+PrsPrc:snytende # ;
LEXICON SOVE !!≈ * **@CODE@**
        +V+Inf:sove    # ;
        +V+Imp:sov     # ;
    +V+Ind+Prs:sover   # ;
    +V+Ind+Prt:sov     # ;
 +V+Ind+PrfPrc:sovet   # ;
     +V+PrsPrc:sovende # ;
LEXICON SPINNE !!≈ * **@CODE@**
          +V+Inf:spinne    # ;
          +V+Imp:spinn     # ;
      +V+Ind+Prs:spinner   # ;
 +V+Ind+Prs+Pass:spinnes   # ;
      +V+Ind+Prt:spant     # ;
       +V+PrfPrc:spunnet   # ;
       +V+PrsPrc:spinnende # ;
LEXICON SPREKKE !!≈ * **@CODE@**
          +V+Inf:sprekke    # ;
          +V+Imp:sprekk     # ;
      +V+Ind+Prs:sprekker   # ;
 +V+Ind+Prs+Pass:sprekkes   # ;
      +V+Ind+Prt:sprakk     # ;
       +V+PrfPrc:sprukket   # ;
       +V+PrsPrc:sprekkende # ;
LEXICON SPRETTE !!≈ * **@CODE@**
          +V+Inf:sprette    # ;
          +V+Imp:sprett     # ;
      +V+Ind+Prs:spretter   # ;
 +V+Ind+Prs+Pass:sprettes   # ;
      +V+Ind+Prt:spratt     # ;
       +V+PrfPrc:sprettet   # ;
       +V+PrsPrc:sprettende # ;
LEXICON SPRINGE !!≈ * **@CODE@**
     +V+Inf:springe    # ;
     +V+Imp:spring     # ;
 +V+Ind+Prs:springer   # ;
 +V+Ind+Prt:sprang     # ;
  +V+PrfPrc:sprunget   # ;
  +V+PrsPrc:springende # ;
