src/fst/stems/verbs.lexc
LEXICON VerbRoot
anslå:an SLÅ ;
avsi:av SI ;
avskjære:av SKJÆRE ;
avskrive:av SKRIVE ;
avslå:av SLÅ ;
beskjære:be SKJÆRE ;
beskrive:be SKRIVE ;
beskyte:be SKYTE ;
beslå:be SLÅ ;
besove:be SOVE ;
fastslå:fast SLÅ ; 
foreskrive:fore SKRIVE ;
foreslå:fore SLÅ ;
forsove:for SOVE ;
forutsi:forut SI ;
framskrive:fram SKRIVE ;
frasi:fra SI ;
fraskrive:fra SKRIVE ;
fremskrive:frem SKRIVE ;
godskrive:god SKRIVE ;
halvsove:halv SOVE ;
illskrike:ill SKRIKE ;
innskrive:inn SKRIVE ;
innskyte:inn SKYTE ;
jernbeslå:jernbe SLÅ ;
knoppskyte:knopp SKYTE ;
kvede: KVEDE ;
lekeslåss:leke SLÅSS ;
lide: LIDE ;
nyskrive:ny SKRIVE ;
omskrive:om SKRIVE ;
oppsi:opp SI ;
overskride:over SKRIDE ; 
overskrive:over SKRIVE ;
oversmøre:over SMØRE ;
påsmøre:på SMØRE ;
reinskrive:rein SKRIVE ;
renskrive:ren SKRIVE ;
ride: RIDE ;
rotskjære:rot SKJÆRE ;
sammenskrive:sammen SKRIVE ;
sammenslå:sammen SLÅ ;
si: SI ;
skamslå:skam SLÅ ;
skjelve: SKJELVE ;
skjære: SKJÆRE ;
skli: SKLI ;
skride: SKRIDE ;
skrike: SKRIKE ;
skrive: SKRIVE ;
skryte: SKRYTE ;
skulle: SKULLE ;
skvette: SKVETTE ;
skyte: SKYTE ;
skyve: SKYVE ;
sleppe: SLEPPE ;
slå: SLÅ ;
slåss: SLÅSS ;
smelle: SMELLE ;
smette: SMETTE ;
smyge: SMYGE ;
småskrike:små SKRIKE ;
småslåss:små SLÅSS ;
småsove:små SOVE ;
smøre: SMØRE ;
snike: SNIKE ;
snorksove:snork SOVE ;
snyte: SNYTE ;
sove: SOVE ;
spinne: SPINNE ;
sprekke: SPREKKE ;
sprette: SPRETTE ;
springe: SPRINGE ;
tilsi:til SI ;
underskride:under SKRIDE ;
underskrive:under SKRIVE ;
underslå:under SLÅ ; 
unnslå:unn SLÅ ;
utsi:ut SI ;
utskrive:ut SKRIVE ;
